Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

23-7.4-101. Short title.

The short title of this article 7.4 is the "Higher Education for Military Service Act".

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1228), ch. 103, p. 781, § 1, effective August 8.

23-7.4-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that:

Active duty members and veterans of the United States armed forces and Colorado National Guard provide an essential service to the nation and to the state of Colorado;

The families of service members often sacrifice personal goals due to frequent moves and deployments that disrupt or delay work and education, including higher education;

Veterans who return to civilian life and their dependents have opportunities to further their education in Colorado through the state system of community and technical colleges, local district colleges, and four-year institutions of higher education; and

Many active duty and veteran military members and their dependents have difficulty navigating the various state and federal laws relating to military benefits, including in-state tuition classification and state financial assistance programs.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that locating provisions of the state's higher education statutes, where possible, into a single article of this title 23 relating to military members, veterans, and military dependents minimizes confusion and provides greater transparency concerning military benefits available in higher education.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1228), ch. 103, p. 781, § 1, effective August 8.

23-7.4-103. Higher education provisions relating to military members, veterans, and dependents - located in other articles.

The following provisions relating to higher education for military members, veterans, and dependents are contained in other articles of this title 23:

Presumptions and rules for determination of status, section 23-7-103 (1)(c), (2)(g), (2)(h), and (5);

Tuition and other financial assistance for dependents of prisoners of war and military personnel missing in action, section 23-3.3-204;

Tuition and other financial assistance for dependents of deceased or permanently disabled National Guardsman, section 23-3.3-205;

Eligibility for payment of a Colorado opportunity fund stipend for off-campus, extended campus, or continuing education classes, section 23-18-202 (5)(d)(I)(F);

Credit for military education and training, section 23-5-145;

Teach Colorado grant initiative, section 23-3.3-901 (4)(d); and

Tuition classification of Canadian military personnel, section 23-7-106.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1228), ch. 103, p. 782, § 1, effective August 8.

23-7.4-104. Veteran education opportunity - noncredit courses - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Audit a course for no credit" or "audit" means enrolling in a course at an institution but not completing course assignments or exams and not receiving academic credit for completing the course.

"Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a state institution of higher education identified in section 23-18-102 (10)(a), a local district college as defined in section 23-71-102, or an area technical college as defined in section 23-60-103.

"Veteran" has the same meaning as set forth in section 28-5-100.3 and includes a member of the Colorado National Guard.

An institution of higher education that has a program or policy that permits a person to audit a course offered by the institution for no credit shall, as part of the institution's program or policy, permit a veteran to audit a course for no credit, subject to any other requirements of the program or policy. The institution may set and collect a fee of no more than ten dollars per course audited by a veteran.

The general assembly encourages each institution that does not have a program or policy that permits a person to audit a course offered by the institution for no credit to permit a veteran to audit a course for no credit. An institution that permits a veteran to audit a course shall not collect a fee of more than ten dollars per course.

An institution that permits a veteran to audit a course for no credit is not required to permit a veteran to audit more than three courses in each academic semester for the fee of up to ten dollars per course. An institution may permit a veteran to audit additional courses for a fee in a different amount set by the institution.

A veteran who audits a course for no credit is not an eligible undergraduate student for the purposes of receiving a college opportunity fund stipend pursuant to article 18 of this title 23.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1407), ch. 258, p. 1893, § 1, effective August 10.